Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
668A]

uniform partition of heirs property act

Section

668A-1 Short title

668A-2 Definitions

668A-3 Applicability; relation to other law

668A-4 Service; notice by posting

668A-5 Commissioners

668A-6 Special master

668A-7 Determination of value

668A-8 Cotenant buyout

668A-9 Partition alternatives

668A-10 Considerations for partition in kind

668A-11 Open-market sale, sealed bids, or auction

668A-12 Report of open-market sale

668A-13 Uniformity of application and construction

668A-14 Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and

National Commerce Act

Note

Chapter effective January 1, 2017.

Cross References

Partition of real estate, see chapter 668.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next